New York, session 2025-2026, A10943.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3246 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3246. Segregated reproductive health care funds. (a) As used in this 4 section, "covered entity" means: 5 (1) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital, 6 medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense-in- 7 curred basis under health insurance policies or contracts that are 8 issued or delivered in the state; and 9 (2) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, 10 or surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are 11 issued or delivered in the state. 12 (b) Any premium funds collected by a covered entity for coverage 13 described in section 1303(b)(1)(B)(i) of the federal Patient Protection 14 and Affordable Care Act in accordance with section 1303(b)(2)(b) and (c) 15 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act shall be used: 16 (1) to provide coverage for reproductive health care clinical services 17 for insureds or enrollees in accordance with section three thousand two 18 hundred sixteen or three thousand two hundred twenty-one of this article 19 or with section four thousand three hundred three of this chapter; and 20 (2) in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. 21 (c) If after the twelve-month period following the end of a plan year 22 the amount of the ending balance of a segregated account established for 23 coverage of reproductive health care clinical services exceeds disburse- 24 ments, ninety percent of the ending balance shall be used to support EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13523-10-6 A. 10943 2 1 coverage of reproductive health care clinical services for which the use 2 of federal funds is prohibited. 3 (d)(1) On or before March first of each year, each covered entity 4 subject to this section shall submit to the superintendent an accounting 5 of receipts, disbursements, accrued interest, and the year-end balance 6 for segregated accounts established by the covered entity under section 7 1303(b)(2)(b) and (c) of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable 8 Care Act: 9 (A) on a form approved by the superintendent; and 10 (B) with any related documentation required by the superintendent. 11 (2) By June first of each year, the department shall confirm that each 12 covered entity has appropriately submitted pursuant to paragraph one of 13 this subsection. 14 (e) (1) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the superintendent 15 shall order the transfer of funds from each covered entity's segregated 16 account established by the covered entity for coverage of reproductive 17 health care clinical services to the reproductive health care access 18 fund established by section ninety-nine-uu of the state finance law in 19 the following amounts: 20 (A) on or before July first, two thousand twenty-seven, ninety percent 21 of the amount of the ending balance of the segregated account that 22 exceeds disbursements for each of plan years two thousand fourteen 23 through two thousand twenty-four; and 24 (B) on or before July first of each year, beginning in two thousand 25 twenty-eight, ninety percent of the amount of the ending balance of a 26 segregated account for that plan year, beginning with plan year two 27 thousand twenty-five. 28 (2) (A) the amount ordered to be transferred under subparagraph (A) of 29 paragraph one of this subsection shall include the amount of interest 30 accrued to the segregated account as of December thirty-first, two thou- 31 sand twenty-six. 32 (B) the amount ordered to be transferred under subparagraph (B) of 33 paragraph one of this subsection shall include the amount of interest 34 accrued to the segregated account as of December thirty-first of the 35 immediately preceding calendar year. 36 (f) A transfer ordered by the superintendent pursuant to subsection 37 (e) of this section shall be made within thirty days of the date of the 38 order. 39 (g) A party aggrieved by an order of the superintendent under this 40 section has the right to a hearing and the right to appeal from the 41 order of the superintendent. 42 (h)(1) The superintendent shall collect data from state-regulated 43 plans on receipts, disbursements, and ending balances for segregated 44 accounts established under § 1303(b)(2)(B) and (C) of the federal 45 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and 45 C.F.R. § 156.280. 46 (2) The superintendent shall issue a report to the governor, the 47 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and to 48 the chairpersons of the assembly committee on ways and means and the 49 senate committee on finance as follows: 50 (A) on or before April first, two thousand twenty-seven, aggregate 51 data collected for the period from January first, two thousand fourteen, 52 to December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-four, both inclusive; 53 (B) on or before April first, two thousand twenty-eight, aggregate 54 data collected for the period from January first, two thousand twenty- 55 five, to December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-five, both inclu- 56 sive; A. 10943 3 1 (C) on or before April first, two thousand twenty-nine, aggregate data 2 collected for the period from January first, two thousand twenty-six, to 3 December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, both inclusive; and 4 (D) on or before January first, two thousand thirty, aggregate data 5 collected for the period from January first, two thousand twenty-seven, 6 to December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, both inclusive. 7 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-uu to 8 read as follows: 9 § 99-uu. Reproductive health care access fund. 1. There is hereby 10 established in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the 11 commissioner of taxation and finance a special fund to be known as the 12 "reproductive health care access fund" (the "fund"). 13 2. The fund shall consist of monies received from the deposit of 14 segregated funds pursuant to section three thousand two hundred forty- 15 six of the insurance law, and all other monies appropriated, credited, 16 or transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law, 17 together with interest earnings of the fund. The state treasurer shall 18 invest the money of the fund in the same manner as other state money may 19 be invested. 20 3. The moneys in the fund shall be kept separate and shall not be 21 commingled with any other moneys in the joint custody of the commission- 22 er of taxation and finance and the state comptroller. 23 4. Monies in the fund from the deposit of segregated reproductive 24 health care access funds pursuant to section three thousand two hundred 25 forty-six of the insurance law shall be used to support reproductive 26 health care clinical services funded through the grant program estab- 27 lished pursuant to section twenty-five hundred ninety-nine-bb-1 of the 28 public health law. Moneys provided pursuant to this section shall be 29 used to supplement and not supplant current funding. 30 5. On or before the first day of February of each year, the comp- 31 troller shall certify to the governor, temporary president of the 32 senate, speaker of the assembly, chair of the senate finance committee 33 and chair of the assembly ways and means committee: 34 (a) the amount of money deposited in the reproductive health care 35 access fund during the preceding calendar year as the result of revenue 36 derived pursuant to section three thousand two hundred forty-six of the 37 insurance law; 38 (b) the amount of money disbursed to the grant program established 39 pursuant to section twenty-five hundred ninety-nine-bb-1 of the public 40 health law during the preceding calendar year; and 41 (c) the amount of money remaining in the fund on December thirty-first 42 of the preceding calendar year. 43 6. All payments from such fund shall be made by the department of 44 taxation and finance after the audit and warrant of the comptroller on 45 vouchers approved by the commissioner of health. 46 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 2599-bb-1 of the public health law is 47 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 48 (c) Prioritize funding for eligible reproductive health care providers 49 and eligible applicants that have not received financial assistance 50 under this program in prior years. 51 § 4. Beginning in fiscal year 2029, the governor shall submit to the 52 legislature an executive budget that includes an appropriation of at 53 least fifty percent of the total funds available in the reproductive 54 health care access fund, as created by section 99-uu of the state 55 finance law. A. 10943 4 1 § 5. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 2 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 3 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 4 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 5 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 6 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 7 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 8 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 9 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 10 § 6. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.